src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG
                 +Sg+Gen:a      K     ;
              +Cmp/SgGen:a      RHyph ;
                 +Sg+Acc:a      K     ;
                 +Sg+Ill:ij     K     ;
                 +Sg+Loc:as     K     ;
  +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:an     K     ; !SOUTH
                 +Sg+Com:ain    K     ;
                    +Ess:an     K     ;
!                +Pl+Nom:at     K     ;
!                +Pl+Gen:ajd9   K     ;
!                +Pl+Acc:ajd9   K     ;
!                +Pl+Ill:ajde   K     ;
!                +Pl+Loc:ain    K     ;
!                +Pl+Com:aigujn K     ;


!The BERN plural forms are different from CNAME because there is
!a form Peraid from Per in coprus.




LEXICON HEIM-sur   !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Use/NG:%> HEIMDECL ;

!LEXICON HEIM-LOAN-plc !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas !Not in use
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Lex:%> HEIMDECL_PLC-ORG ; !
!+Err/Lex:%>a PLACELASH ;

LEXICON HEIM-plc !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%> HEIMDECL_PLC-ORG ; !
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth:%> HEIMDECL_PLC-ORG ; !
:%>a PLACELASH ;


LEXICON HEIMDECL
HEIM-DC ;
:i ACCRA-I ;
:ma ACCRA-OBL ;
 MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
:ma ACCRA-IICASE ;
:ma ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;


LEXICON HEIMDECL_PLC-ORG
HEIM-DC ;
:i ACCRA-I ;
:ma ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
!:ma ACCRA-IICASE ;


LEXICON HEIM-DC
@U.Cap.Obl@ HEIM-NE ;

LEXICON HEIM-NE
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;
+Ess:an K ;

LEXICON SUND-sur !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth:%> SUNDDECL ;

LEXICON SUND-LOAN-plc !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Lex:%> SUNDDECL_PLC-ORG ; !
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Lex:%> DenominalAdjsC2 ; !
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Lex:%> DenominalAdjsC3 ;    !
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Lex:%> SUNDDECL_PLC-ORG ; !

LEXICON SUND-plc !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas af
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> SUND-ERR ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%> SUNDDECL_PLC-ORG ; !
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> DenominalAdjsC2 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%> DenominalAdjsC3 ;    !
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth:%> SUNDDECL_PLC-ORG ; !
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> SUND-ERR ;

LEXICON SUND-ERR
+Sg+Gen:da K ;
+Cmp/SgGen:da RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:da K ;
+Sg+Loc:das K ;
+Sg+Com:dain K ;


LEXICON SUNDDECL
HEIM-DC ;
:i ACCRA-I ;
:da ACCRA-OBL ;
 MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
:da ACCRA-IICASE ;
:da ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;


LEXICON SUNDDECL_PLC-ORG
HEIM-DC ;
:i ACCRA-I ;
:da ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
!:da ACCRA-IICASE ;

! From MALIS
LEXICON DUORTNUS-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> DUORTNUSDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON SUTTES-plc ! som DUORTNUS, men med -e- for Sg+Nom  
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:%>X8 flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess:%>X4in flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:%>X2a flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:%>X2 flagK ; !
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:%>X2a flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:%>X2 flagK ; !
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:%>X2ij flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc:%>X2is flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2in flagK ; !SOUTH
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com:%>X2ijn flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgNom@U.Cap.Obl@:%>X800@U.Cap.Obl@ RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgGen@U.Cap.Obl@:%>X2a0@U.Cap.Obl@ RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG@U.Cap.Obl@:%>X2000@U.Cap.Obl@ RHyph ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> DUORTNUSDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X4 DenominalAdjsC2 ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%>X4 DenominalAdjsC3 ; !

LEXICON DUORTNUS_MWE-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> DUORTNUSDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
@U.Cap.Obl@ DUORTNUS-OBL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL_PLC-ORG ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
@U.Cap.Obl@ DUORTNUS-OBL_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON DUORTNUS-OBL
+Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
+Attr:X4 K ;
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X7 RHyph ; !
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X8 RHyph ; !
+Cmp/SgNom:X4 RHyph ;
+Ess:X4in K ;
+Sg+Gen:X2a K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:X2 K ; !
+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:X2 RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen:X2a RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:X2a K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:X2 K ; !
+Sg+Ill:X2ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:X2is K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X2in K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:X2ijn K ;
+Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
+Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
+Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
+Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
+Pl+Com:X2ijguin K ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-OBL_PLC-ORG
+Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X7 RHyph ; !
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X8 RHyph ; !
+Cmp/SgNom:X4 RHyph ;
+Ess:X4in K ;
+Sg+Gen:X2a K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:X2 K ; !
+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:X2 RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen:X2a RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:X2a K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:X2 K ; !
+Sg+Ill:X2ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:X2is K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X2in K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:X2ijn K ;
!+Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
!+Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:X2ijguin K ;



LEXICON RANES-plc !Ráneš:Rátnáhii
0@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RANES-OBL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:ne%>X4š DenominalAdjsC2 ;


LEXICON RANES-OBL
+Sg+Nom:neX4š K ;
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:neX7š RHyph ; !
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:neX8š RHyph ; !
+Cmp/SgNom:neX4š RHyph ;
+Ess:neX4šin K ;
+Sg+Gen:tnáX2ha K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:tnáX2t K ; !
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:tnáX2t RHyph ; !
+Cmp/SgGen:tnáX2ha RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:tnáX2ha K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:tnáX2t K ; !
+Sg+Ill:tnáX2hij K ;
+Sg+Loc:tnáX2his K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:tnáX2hin K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:tnáX2hijn K ;
!+Pl+Nom:tnáX2hat K ;
!+Pl+Gen:tnáX2hijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:tnáX2hijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:tnáX2hijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:tnáX2hijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:tnáX2hijguin K ;

LEXICON CAVKKUS-plc !Čávkkus:Čávkohii
0@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ CAVKKUS-OBL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:k%>us DenominalAdjsC2 ;


LEXICON CAVKKUS-OBL
+Sg+Nom:kus K ;
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:kos RHyph ; !
+Cmp/SgNom:kus RHyph ;
+Ess:kusin K ;
+Sg+Gen:oha K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:ot K ; !
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:ot RHyph ; !
+Cmp/SgGen:oha RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:oha K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:ot K ; !
+Sg+Ill:ohij K ;
+Sg+Loc:ohis K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:ohin K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:ohijn K ;
!+Pl+Nom:ohat K ;
!+Pl+Gen:ohijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:ohijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ohijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:ohijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:ohijguin K ;

LEXICON GATA-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:gata ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:gaten LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+ABBR+Sem/Plc:gt # ;

LEXICON ANAR-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> ANARDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>ažž PLACE-DIMV ;

LEXICON ANAR-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> ANARDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON ANAR-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> ANARDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>ažž PLACE-DIMV ;

LEXICON ANAR-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  ANARDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>ažž PLACE-DIMV ;

LEXICON ANAR-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ANARDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> DenominalAdjsC2 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%> DenominalAdjsC3 ; ! Virker å være overgenerering, denne er nesten helt lik

LEXICON ANAR_MWE-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ANARDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON ANARDECL ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
@U.Cap.Obl@ ANAR-OBL ;

LEXICON ANARDECL_PLC-ORG ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
@U.Cap.Obl@ ANAR-OBL_PLC-ORG ;



LEXICON ANAR-OBL
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X7 RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;
+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:X2 RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen:X2a RHyph ;
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Attr: K ;
+Ess:in K ;
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: K ; !
+Sg+Acc:a K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc: K ; !
+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:is K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:in K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
+Pl+Nom:at K ;
+Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
+Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
+Pl+Com:ijguin K ;

LEXICON ANAR-OBL_PLC-ORG
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X7 RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;
+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:X2 RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen:X2a RHyph ;
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Ess:in K ;
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: K ; !
+Sg+Acc:a K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc: K ; !
+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:is K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:in K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
!+Pl+Nom:at K ;
!+Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:ijguin K ;


LEXICON HEANDARAT-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> HEANDARATDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>  HEANDARATDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>aX6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  HEANDARATDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>aX6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  HEANDARATDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> DenominalAdjsC2 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%> DenominalAdjsC3 ; !
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:aX4 VUONAT ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT_MWE-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  HEANDARATDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON HEANDARATDECL ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
@U.Cap.Obl@ HEANDARAT-OBL ;

LEXICON HEANDARATDECL_PLC-ORG ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
@U.Cap.Obl@ HEANDARAT-OBL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-OBL
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Attr: K ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen:aX4 RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;
+Sg+Gen:aX4 K ;
+Sg+Acc:aX4 K ;
+Sg+Ill:aX3j K ;
+Sg+Loc:aX4s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:aX4n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:aX5jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:aX4t K ;
+Pl+Gen:aX5jd K ;
+Pl+Acc:aX5jd K ;
+Pl+Ill:aX5jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:aX5jn K ;
+Pl+Com:aX5jgujn K ;
+Ess:an K ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-OBL_PLC-ORG
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen:aX4 RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;
+Sg+Gen:aX4 K ;
+Sg+Acc:aX4 K ;
+Sg+Ill:aX3j K ;
+Sg+Loc:aX4s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:aX4n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:aX5jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:aX4t K ;
!+Pl+Gen:aX5jd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:aX5jd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:aX5jde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:aX5jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:aX5jgujn K ;
+Ess:an K ;


LEXICON GEAVNNIS-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>  GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> GEAVNNISDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsC2 ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsC3 ; !

LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL
@U.Cap.Obl@ GEAVNNIS-OBL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL_PLC-ORG
@U.Cap.Obl@ GEAVNNIS-OBL_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON GEAVNNIS-OBL
+Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
+Attr:X4 K ;
+Ess:X4in K ;
+CmpN/SgN+Err/Orth:X8 RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgN:X4 RHyph ;
+Sg+Gen:Y5 K ;
+Cmp/SgGen:Y5 RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:Y5 K ;
+Sg+Ill:Y5j K ;
+Sg+Loc:Y5s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:Y5n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:Y5jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:Y5t K ;
+Pl+Gen:Y5jd K ;
+Cmp/PlGen:jd RHyph ;
+Pl+Acc:Y5jd K ;
+Pl+Ill:Y5jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:Y5jn K ;
+Pl+Com:Y5jgujn K ;

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-OBL_PLC-ORG
+Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
+Ess:X4in K ;
+CmpN/SgN+Err/Orth:X8 RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgN:X4 RHyph ;
+Sg+Gen:Y5 K ;
+Cmp/SgGen:Y5 RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:Y5 K ;
+Sg+Ill:Y5j K ;
+Sg+Loc:Y5s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:Y5n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:Y5jn K ;
!+Pl+Nom:Y5t K ;
!+Pl+Gen:Y5jd K ;
!+Cmp/PlGen:jd RHyph ;
!+Pl+Acc:Y5jd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:Y5jde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:Y5jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:Y5jgujn K ;

LEXICON BALAK-plc !singulars on -k
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BALAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BALAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>k DenominalAdjsC2 ;

LEXICON BALAK_MWE-plc !singulars on -k
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BALAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON BALAK-fem !singulars on -k
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> BALAK-UCASE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:k # ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON BALAK-org !singulars on -k
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> BALAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON BALAK-sur !singulars on -k
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BALAK-UCASE ;

LEXICON BALAK-ani !singulars on -k
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> BALAK-UCASE ;

LEXICON BALAK-UCASE
@U.Cap.Obl@ BALAK-UCASEcase ;
